backup/apertium-mal-eng.mal.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<!--
	Dictionary:
	Sections: 1
	Entries: 310
	Sdefs: 59
	Paradigms: 97
	Last processed by: apertium-dixtools format /home/tachyons/apertium-mal-eng/apertium-mal-eng.mal.dix /home/tachyons/apertium-mal-eng/apertium-mal-eng.mal.dix  -useTabs

-->
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>അആഇഈഉഊഋഌഎഏഐഒഓഔകഖഗഘങചഛജഝഞടഠഡഢണതഥദധനഩപഫബഭമയരറലളഴവശഷസഹഽാിീുൂൃൄെേൈൊോൌ്ൗൠൡൢൣൺൻര്‍ൾൿംഃ്</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n" 	c="Noun . നാമം"/> 
    <sdef n="np" 	c="Proper noun"/> 
    <sdef n="adv" 	c="Adverb . ക്രിയാ വിശേഷണപദം"/> 
    <sdef n="adj" 	c="Adjective . നാമവിശേഷണം"/> 
    <sdef n="num" 	c="Numeral"/> 
    <sdef n="prn" 	c="Pronoun"/> 
    <sdef n="post" 	c="Postposition"/> 
    <sdef n="ij" 	c="Interjection"/> 
    <sdef n="vbser" 	c="Verb 'to be'"/> 
    <sdef n="cnjcoo" 	c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/> 
    <sdef n="vblex" 	c="verb"/> 
    <sdef n="fv" 	c="finite verb"/> 
    <sdef n="cjv" 	c="conjunctive verb"/> 
    <sdef n="av" 	c="acrion verb"/> 
    <sdef n="inf" 	c="infinitive verb"/> 
    <sdef n="infp" 	c=" purposive infinitive"/> 
    <sdef n="oblig" 	c="obligative"/> 
    <sdef n="sim" 	c="simultaneous"/> 
    <sdef n="df" 	c="defective verb"/> 
    <sdef n="vaux" 	c="oxilary verb"/> 
    <sdef n="det" 	c="determinats"/> 
    <sdef n="ind" /> 
    <sdef n="m" 	c="Masculine · പുല്ലിംഗം"/> 
    <sdef n="f" 	c="Feminine · സ്ത്രീലിമ്ഗം "/> 
    <sdef n="nt" 	c="Neuter · നപുംസകലിംഗം"/> 
    <sdef n="mf" 	c="Masculine / Feminine · पु:लिंग /स्त्रीलिंग"/> 
    <sdef n="mfn" 	c="Masculine / Feminine / Neuter · पु:लिंग / स्त्रीलिंग / नपुसकलिंग"/> 
    <sdef n="sg" 	c="Singular . ഏകവചനം"/> 
    <sdef n="pl" 	c="Plural . ബഹുവചനം"/> 
    <sdef n="sp" 	c="Singular / Plural . ഏകവചനം/ ബഹുവചനം"/> 
    <sdef n="nom" 	c="Nominative"/> 
    <sdef n="acc" 	c="Accusative"/> 
    <sdef n="ins" 	c="Instrumental"/> 
    <sdef n="soc" 	c="Sociative"/> 
    <sdef n="dat" 	c="Dative"/> 
    <sdef n="voc" 	c="Vocative"/> 
    <sdef n="gen" 	c="Genitive"/> 
    <sdef n="loc" 	c="Locative"/> 
    <sdef n="p1" 	c="First person · प्रथम पुरुष"/> 
    <sdef n="p2" 	c="Second person · द्वितिय पुरुष"/> 
    <sdef n="p3" 	c="Third person · तृतिय पुरुष"/> 
    <sdef n="pres" 	c="Present tense . വര്‍ത്ത്മാന കാലം "/> 
    <sdef n="past" 	c="Past tense . ഭൂത കാലം "/> 
    <sdef n="fut" 	c="Future tense . ഭാവി  കാലം "/> 
    <sdef n="neg" 	c="negative വിപരീതം"/> 
    <sdef n="cont" 	c="continous"/> 
    <sdef n="ant" 	c="Anthroponym"/> 
    <sdef n="pers" 	c="Personal"/> 
    <sdef n="itg" 	c="Interrogative"/> 
    <sdef n="cm" 	c="Comma"/> 
    <sdef n="quot" 	c="Quotation mark"/> 
    <sdef n="sent" 	c="Sentence marker"/> 
    <sdef n="subj" 	c="Subject"/> 
    <sdef n="sint" 	c="???"/> 
     <sdef n="pr" 	c="???"/> 
    <sdef n="dem" 	c="???"/> 
    <sdef n="neg" 	c="negative"/> 
    <sdef n="vblex" 	c="verb"/> 
    <sdef n="unknown" /> 
    <sdef n="v" 	c="verb"/> 
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
<pardef n="clitics_u">
  <e>       <p><l>യും</l>       <r><j/>ും<s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ും</l>        <r><j/>ും<s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <i></i></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="clitics_lekk">
  <e>       <p><l>േക്ക്</l>       <r><j/>ലേക്ക്<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="clitics_a">
  <e>       <p><l>വും</l>       <r><j/>ും<s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ും</l>        <r><j/>ും<s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <i></i></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="clitics_um">
  <e>       <p><l>യും</l>       <r><j/>ും<s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>വും</l>       <r><j/>ും<s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ും</l>        <r><j/>ും<s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <i></i></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="clitics_ppol">
  <e>       <p><l>പ്പോള്‍</l>   <r><j/>അപ്പോള്‍<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="clitics_nam">
  <e>       <p><l>യാണ്</l>      <r><j/>ാണ്<s n="vbser"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ലാണ്</l>      <r><j/>ാണ്<s n="vbser"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ാണ്</l>       <r><j/>ാണ്<s n="vbser"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>നാണ്</l>      <r><j/>ാണ്<s n="vbser"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ളാണ്</l>      <r><j/>ാണ്<s n="vbser"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ടാണ്</l>      <r><j/>ാണ്<s n="vbser"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <i></i></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="clitics_nam_empty">
  <e>       <p><l>യാണ്</l>      <r><j/>ാണ്<s n="vbser"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ലാണ്</l>      <r><j/>ാണ്<s n="vbser"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ളാണ്</l>      <r><j/>ാണ്<s n="vbser"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>മാണ്</l>      <r><j/>ാണ്<s n="vbser"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>നാണ്</l>      <r><j/>ാണ്<s n="vbser"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="clitics_aayirunnu">
  <e>       <p><l>ായിരുന്നു</l> <r><j/>ായിരുന്നു<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>യായിരുന്നു</l><r><j/>ായിരുന്നു<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <i></i></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="clitics_loode">
  <e>       <p><l>ലൂടെ</l>      <r><j/>ലൂടെ<s n="unknown"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="clitics_o">
  <e>       <p><l>മോ</l>        <r><j/>ോ<s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>വോ</l>        <r><j/>ോ<s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>യോ</l>        <r><j/>ോ<s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <i></i></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="clitics_yodappam">
  <e>       <p><l>യോടപ്പം</l>   <r><j/>ോടപ്പം<s n="post"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ലോടപ്പം</l>   <r><j/>ോടപ്പം<s n="post"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <i></i></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="clitics_ode">
  <e>       <p><l>യോടെ</l>      <r><j/><s n="post"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ലോടെ</l>      <r><j/><s n="post"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="അത് __n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="അത്">             <i>അത്</i><par n="അത് __n"/></e>
<e lm="അവള്‍"><i>അവള്‍</i><par n="അത് __n"/></e>
 <e lm="കഴിയുക "><i>കഴി</i><par n="അത് __n"/></e>
 <e lm="ആറ്"><i>ആറ്</i><par n="അത് __n"/></e>
